Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.92.080

Voter challenge of electoral system—Filing of action—Multiple challenges—Reimbursement of costs.

(1) Any voter who resides in the political subdivision, organization whose roster of members and volunteers includes a voter who resides in the political subdivision, or tribe located at least in part in the political subdivision may file an action under this chapter if, 90 days after a political subdivision receives notice of a challenge to its electoral system under RCW 29A.92.060, the political subdivision has not obtained a court order stating that it has adopted a remedy in compliance with RCW 29A.92.020.

(2) If a political subdivision has received two or more notices containing materially different proposed remedies, the political subdivision shall work in good faith with the persons to implement a remedy that provides the protected class or classes identified in the notices an equal opportunity to elect candidates of their choice. If the political subdivision adopts one of the remedies offered, or a different remedy that takes multiple notices into account, the political subdivision shall seek a court order acknowledging that the political subdivision's remedy is reasonably necessary to avoid a violation of RCW 29A.92.020. The persons, organizations, or tribes who submitted the notice may support or oppose such an order, and may obtain public records to do so. The political subdivision must provide all political, census, and demographic data and any analysis of that data used to develop the remedy in its filings seeking the court order and with any documents made public. All facts and reasonable inferences shall be viewed in the light most favorable to those opposing the political subdivision's proposed remedy at this stage. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the court will decline to approve the political subdivision's proposed remedy at this stage.

(3) If the court concludes that the political subdivision's remedy complies with RCW 29A.92.020, an action under this chapter may not be brought against that political subdivision for four years by any party so long as the political subdivision does not enact a change to or deviation from the remedy during this four-year period that would otherwise give rise to an action under this chapter.

(4)(a) If the court issues an order under subsection (2) of this section, the persons, organizations, or tribes who sent notices may make a demand to the political subdivision for reimbursement of the costs incurred in conducting the research necessary to send the notices. A demand made under this subsection must:

(i) Be in writing;

(ii) Be received by the political subdivision within 30 days of the adoption of the new electoral system; and

(iii) Include financial documentation, such as a detailed invoice for demographic services, that supports the demand. The political subdivision may request additional documentation if the documentation provided is insufficient for the political subdivision to corroborate the claimed costs.

(b) The political subdivision shall, within 60 days of receiving the demand, reimburse the reasonable costs of the persons, organizations, or tribes who sent the notices, not to exceed $50,000.

[ 2023 c 56 s 9; 2019 c 64 s 11; 2018 c 113 s 304.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 56: See note following RCW 29A.92.720.

Explanatory statement—2019 c 64: See note following RCW 1.20.110.